Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4447.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin BASE GRANT RIDERS.new text end new text begin (a) By November 30, 2026, the Department of Management and Budget; the Department of Human Services; the Department of Children, Youth, and Families; the Department of Health; and Direct Care and Treatment must submit the legislative rider text, base appropriation amounts, and relevant Minnesota Laws for all grants in the fiscal year 2028 and 2029 base to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over health, human services, and children. The departments must send copies to the revisor of statutes, House Research, House Fiscal Analysis, and Senate Counsel, Research, and Fiscal Analysis. new text end new text begin (b) For the purposes of this section, "legislative rider text" means the enacted Minnesota Laws language that accompanied the appropriation for a grant and set the purpose, recipients, or requirements for the grant. new text end